Hawaii statutes.
[§188-71] Harassment of fishermen;
prohibition. (a) No person shall intentionally prevent or attempt to
prevent the lawful taking of fish by a person licensed pursuant to section
188-50 by:

(1) Placing the person's self in a location in which
human presence may affect the behavior of fish to be taken or the feasibility
of taking such fish;

(2) Creating a visual, aural, olfactory, or physical
stimulus to affect the behavior of fish to be taken;

(3) Affecting the condition or placement of personal
property intended for use in the taking; or

(4) Obstructing the person's access to areas in which
the person intends to lawfully take fish.

(b) No person shall enter or remain upon
public lands or waters, or upon private lands or waters, without permission of
the owner or the owner's agent, with intent to violate this section.

(c) The maximum penalty for violation of
subsection (a) or (b) is a fine of $500, thirty days imprisonment, or both. [L
1995, c 186, §2]

Cross References

General administrative penalties, see §187A-12.5.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next